Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0954.
people of the state of michigan enact: Enacting section 1. Section 206a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1206a, is repealed. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01234'25) or House Bill No. ____ (request no. H01234'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.